District of Columbia statutes.
6-1451.07a

Benchmarking Enforcement Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the Benchmarking Enforcement Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Mayor in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

Penalties collected pursuant to § 6-1451.03(c)(2)(D) shall be deposited in the Fund.

(c)

Money in the Fund shall be used to support and improve the administration and practices of the benchmarking program established by this chapter.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization in an approved budget and fiscal plan, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-234, § 8a
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6062, 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6062 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).